Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 454.777 is amended to read:
454.777. The Legislative Assembly declares it to be  the policy of this state to assist the people
of this state in protecting public health and safety  and the quality of the waters of this state by
making [ grants] financial assistance  available for [the development of low-interest loan programs
for] the repair, replacement, upgrade or evaluation  of residential or small business on-site septic
systems. The Legislative Assembly also declares it to be the policy of this  state to support the
availability of affordable loans to assist  residents to remain in their homes and thereby promote
long-term home ownership and sustainable housing opportunities.
SECTION 2.  ORS 454.779 is amended to read:
454.779. (1) As used in this section and ORS 454.777:
(a) “Available sewer” means an existing public sewer system that a  residence or small business
is capable of being connected to:
(A) In compliance with state and local law; and
(B) Without a significant extension of the public sewer system.
(b) [ “Loan program” ] “Financial assistance program”  means a program to provide grants,
loans or other assistance that is  funded by a program grant awarded under this section.
(c)(A) “On-site septic  system” means a subsurface on-site sewage treatment and disposal system,
including, but not limited to, alternative sewage disposal  systems, nonwater-carried sewage disposal
facilities and subsurface sewage disposal systems as those terms are defined in ORS 454.605.
(B) “On-site septic system” does  not include any system that is designed to treat and dispose
of industrial waste.
(d)(A) “Residence” or “residential” means single-unit or multiple-unit housing,  whether
occupied by the owner or a tenant.
(B) “Residence”  or “residential” does not include property used to provide short-term
lodging.
[(d)] (e)  “Small business” means a corporation,  partnership, sole proprietorship or other legal
entity formed for the purpose of making  a profit and that generates less than 3,500 gallons of
wastewater per day.
Enrolled Senate Bill 830 (SB 830-INTRO) Page 1
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall award  program  grants for the  purpose of
developing and administering [ loan] financial assistance  programs [ to provide low-interest loans ] for
the purposes described in subsection (3)(b) of this  section. The Environmental Quality Commission
may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
(3) The department may not disburse program grant funds  under this section unless the de-
partment and the  intended program grant award recipient first enter into a grant agreement. The
grant agreement must:
(a) Provide that a lender that participates in a [ loan] financial assistance  program  must agree
to subordinate the lender’s lien to the borrower’s consensual mortgage lien.
(b) Require that [ loans] financial assistance  provided to  property owners  [ borrowers under a
loan program ] must be used for at least one of the following purposes to address  a public health and
safety risk or to otherwise protect or maintain water quality in the waters of this state:
(A) To repair a damaged, malfunctioning or  inoperable residential or small business on-site
septic system.
(B) To replace  a damaged, malfunctioning or inoperable residential or small business on-site
septic system with:
(i) A new, used or reconditioned functional residential or small business on-site septic system;
(ii) A new, used or reconditioned functional cluster on-site septic system; or
(iii) A connection to an available  sewer, and to properly decommission and discontinue use of
the on-site septic system.
(C) To upgrade a residential or small business on-site  septic system with a newer or more ad-
vanced on-site septic system. An upgrade may include alterations if the work  is part of a repair or
if the on-site septic system being upgraded is more than 25 years old.
(D) To  replace the waste disposal well or sewage drill hole of an otherwise functional residential
or small business on-site septic system.
(E) To conduct a regional evaluation of community, residential or small business on-site septic
systems to determine whether repair or replacement is necessary.
(c) Require that, if a residence or small business with  a damaged, malfunctioning or inoperable
on-site septic system is located within the territory  of an available sewer, and is required to connect
to the available sewer, [ a loan] financial assistance  provided [ under a loan program ] to address the
damaged, malfunctioning or inoperable on-site septic system must be used  to install a connection to
the available sewer and to properly decommission and discontinue use of the on-site septic system.
(d) Require that  a loan provided under a [ loan] financial assistance  program must be in an
amount that covers 100 percent  of the costs associated with the purposes under paragraph (b) of this
subsection for which the loan is provided, unless the borrower  requests and consents to a loan that
covers a lower percentage of the costs.
(e) Require that  a program grant award recipient must provide a mechanism for ensuring
compliance with any locally required operation and maintenance  of an on-site septic system for
which [ a loan ] financial assistance  is provided [ under a loan program ].
(f) Require that a program grant award recipient use accounting, auditing and fiscal procedures
that conform to generally accepted government accounting standards.
(4) In selecting program grant award recipients under this section, the department shall give
preference to applicants that:
(a) [ Prioritize, but do not limit themselves to, providing loans to ] Provide financial  assistance
to low and moderate  income  households, residential housing providers and small business [ ap-
plicants] property owners  that are unable to obtain traditional financing;
(b) Can demonstrate prior success in offering, underwriting, servicing and managing loans , or
providing other financial assistance,  to:
(A) Members of low and moderate income populations;
(B) Persons with a range of credit qualifications; and
(C) Residential and commercial [ borrowers ] property owners ; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 830 (SB 830-INTRO) Page 2
(c) Plan to engage additional stakeholders in outreach and marketing efforts for a [ loan] fi-
nancial assistance program.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 830 (SB 830-INTRO) Page 3